District of Columbia statutes.
7-504.03

Qualifications.

Members shall be appointed with due consideration for fair geographical distribution, representation from organizations of older persons, public and voluntary agencies concerned with the aged, and members of the general public who have given evidence of particular dedication to and understanding of the needs of the aged. At least 8 members shall be 60 years of age or over, and all must be residents of the District of Columbia.

History

Oct. 29, 1975, D.C. Law 1-24, title IV, § 403, 22 DCR 2460

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2223.
1973 Ed., § 6-1723.